Illinois, session 104th, HB1072.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title; references to Act. This Act may be 5cited as the Mobile Panic Alert System Act. This Act may be 6referred to as Alyssa's Law. 7    Section 5. Mobile panic alert system.8    (a) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, each public 9school, including a charter school, shall implement a mobile 10panic alert system capable of connecting diverse emergency 11services technologies to ensure real-time coordination between 12multiple first responder agencies. Such system, to be known as 13"Alyssa's Alert", must integrate with local public safety 14answering point infrastructure to transmit 9-1-1 calls and 15mobile activations.16    (b) In addition to the requirements of subsection (a), a 17school district may implement additional strategies or systems 18to ensure real-time coordination between multiple first 19responder agencies in a school security emergency.20    (c) For the 2026 fiscal year, the State Board of Education 21shall issue a competitive solicitation to contract for a 22mobile panic alert system that may be used by each school 23district. The State Board shall consult with the Illinois   HB1072- 2 -LRB104 04498 LNS 14525 b1State Police and the Illinois Emergency Management Agency in 2the development of the competitive solicitation for the mobile 3panic alert system. 4    Section 90. The School Code is amended by changing Section 527A-5 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/27A-5)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 102-466)8    Sec. 27A-5. Charter school; legal entity; requirements. 9    (a) A charter school shall be a public, nonsectarian, 10nonreligious, non-home based, and non-profit school. A charter 11school shall be organized and operated as a nonprofit 12corporation or other discrete, legal, nonprofit entity 13authorized under the laws of the State of Illinois.14    (b) A charter school may be established under this Article 15by creating a new school or by converting an existing public 16school or attendance center to charter school status. In all 17new applications to establish a charter school in a city 18having a population exceeding 500,000, operation of the 19charter school shall be limited to one campus. This limitation 20does not apply to charter schools existing or approved on or 21before April 16, 2003.22    (b-5) (Blank). 23    (c) A charter school shall be administered and governed by 24its board of directors or other governing body in the manner   HB1072- 3 -LRB104 04498 LNS 14525 b1provided in its charter. The governing body of a charter 2school shall be subject to the Freedom of Information Act and 3the Open Meetings Act. A charter school's board of directors 4or other governing body must include at least one parent or 5guardian of a pupil currently enrolled in the charter school 6who may be selected through the charter school or a charter 7network election, appointment by the charter school's board of 8directors or other governing body, or by the charter school's 9Parent Teacher Organization or its equivalent. 10    (c-5) No later than January 1, 2021 or within the first 11year of his or her first term, every voting member of a charter 12school's board of directors or other governing body shall 13complete a minimum of 4 hours of professional development 14leadership training to ensure that each member has sufficient 15familiarity with the board's or governing body's role and 16responsibilities, including financial oversight and 17accountability of the school, evaluating the principal's and 18school's performance, adherence to the Freedom of Information 19Act and the Open Meetings Act, and compliance with education 20and labor law. In each subsequent year of his or her term, a 21voting member of a charter school's board of directors or 22other governing body shall complete a minimum of 2 hours of 23professional development training in these same areas. The 24training under this subsection may be provided or certified by 25a statewide charter school membership association or may be 26provided or certified by other qualified providers approved by   HB1072- 4 -LRB104 04498 LNS 14525 b1the State Board. 2    (d) For purposes of this subsection (d), "non-curricular 3health and safety requirement" means any health and safety 4requirement created by statute or rule to provide, maintain, 5preserve, or safeguard safe or healthful conditions for 6students and school personnel or to eliminate, reduce, or 7prevent threats to the health and safety of students and 8school personnel. "Non-curricular health and safety 9requirement" does not include any course of study or 10specialized instructional requirement for which the State 11Board has established goals and learning standards or which is 12designed primarily to impart knowledge and skills for students 13to master and apply as an outcome of their education.14    A charter school shall comply with all non-curricular 15health and safety requirements applicable to public schools 16under the laws of the State of Illinois. The State Board shall 17promulgate and post on its Internet website a list of 18non-curricular health and safety requirements that a charter 19school must meet. The list shall be updated annually no later 20than September 1. Any charter contract between a charter 21school and its authorizer must contain a provision that 22requires the charter school to follow the list of all 23non-curricular health and safety requirements promulgated by 24the State Board and any non-curricular health and safety 25requirements added by the State Board to such list during the 26term of the charter. Nothing in this subsection (d) precludes   HB1072- 5 -LRB104 04498 LNS 14525 b1an authorizer from including non-curricular health and safety 2requirements in a charter school contract that are not 3contained in the list promulgated by the State Board, 4including non-curricular health and safety requirements of the 5authorizing local school board. 6    (e) Except as otherwise provided in the School Code, a 7charter school shall not charge tuition; provided that a 8charter school may charge reasonable fees for textbooks, 9instructional materials, and student activities.10    (f) A charter school shall be responsible for the 11management and operation of its fiscal affairs, including, but 12not limited to, the preparation of its budget. An audit of each 13charter school's finances shall be conducted annually by an 14outside, independent contractor retained by the charter 15school. The contractor shall not be an employee of the charter 16school or affiliated with the charter school or its authorizer 17in any way, other than to audit the charter school's finances. 18To ensure financial accountability for the use of public 19funds, on or before December 1 of every year of operation, each 20charter school shall submit to its authorizer and the State 21Board a copy of its audit and a copy of the Form 990 the 22charter school filed that year with the federal Internal 23Revenue Service. In addition, if deemed necessary for proper 24financial oversight of the charter school, an authorizer may 25require quarterly financial statements from each charter 26school.   HB1072- 6 -LRB104 04498 LNS 14525 b1    (g) A charter school shall comply with all provisions of 2this Article, the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act, 3all federal and State laws and rules applicable to public 4schools that pertain to special education and the instruction 5of English learners, and its charter. A charter school is 6exempt from all other State laws and regulations in this Code 7governing public schools and local school board policies; 8however, a charter school is not exempt from the following:9        (1) Sections 10-21.9 and 34-18.5 of this Code 10    regarding criminal history records checks and checks of 11    the Statewide Sex Offender Database and Statewide Murderer 12    and Violent Offender Against Youth Database of applicants 13    for employment;14        (2) Sections 10-20.14, 10-22.6, 22-100, 24-24, 34-19, 15    and 34-84a of this Code regarding discipline of students;16        (3) the Local Governmental and Governmental Employees 17    Tort Immunity Act;18        (4) Section 108.75 of the General Not For Profit 19    Corporation Act of 1986 regarding indemnification of 20    officers, directors, employees, and agents;21        (5) the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act;22        (5.5) subsection (b) of Section 10-23.12 and 23    subsection (b) of Section 34-18.6 of this Code;24        (6) the Illinois School Student Records Act;25        (7) Section 10-17a of this Code regarding school 26    report cards;  HB1072- 7 -LRB104 04498 LNS 14525 b1        (8) the P-20 Longitudinal Education Data System Act;2        (9) Section 27-23.7 of this Code regarding bullying 3    prevention;4        (10) Section 2-3.162 of this Code regarding student 5    discipline reporting;6        (11) Sections 22-80 and 27-8.1 of this Code;7        (12) Sections 10-20.60 and 34-18.53 of this Code;8        (13) Sections 10-20.63 and 34-18.56 of this Code;9        (14) Sections 22-90 and 26-18 of this Code;10        (15) Section 22-30 of this Code; 11        (16) Sections 24-12 and 34-85 of this Code;12        (17) the Seizure Smart School Act;13        (18) Section 2-3.64a-10 of this Code;14        (19) Sections 10-20.73 and 34-21.9 of this Code;15        (20) Section 10-22.25b of this Code;16        (21) Section 27-9.1a of this Code;17        (22) Section 27-9.1b of this Code; 18        (23) Section 34-18.8 of this Code;19        (25) Section 2-3.188 of this Code;20        (26) Section 22-85.5 of this Code; 21        (27) subsections (d-10), (d-15), and (d-20) of Section 22    10-20.56 of this Code; 23        (28) Sections 10-20.83 and 34-18.78 of this Code; 24        (29) Section 10-20.13 of this Code; 25        (30) Section 28-19.2 of this Code; 26        (31) Section 34-21.6 of this Code;  HB1072- 8 -LRB104 04498 LNS 14525 b1        (32) Section 22-85.10 of this Code;2        (33) Section 2-3.196 of this Code; 3        (34) Section 22-95 of this Code; 4        (35) Section 34-18.62 of this Code;5        (36) the Illinois Human Rights Act; and6        (37) Section 2-3.204 of this Code; and .7        (38) the Mobile Panic Alert System Act. 8    The change made by Public Act 96-104 to this subsection 9(g) is declaratory of existing law.10    (h) A charter school may negotiate and contract with a 11school district, the governing body of a State college or 12university or public community college, or any other public or 13for-profit or nonprofit private entity for: (i) the use of a 14school building and grounds or any other real property or 15facilities that the charter school desires to use or convert 16for use as a charter school site, (ii) the operation and 17maintenance thereof, and (iii) the provision of any service, 18activity, or undertaking that the charter school is required 19to perform in order to carry out the terms of its charter. 20Except as provided in subsection (i) of this Section, a school 21district may charge a charter school reasonable rent for the 22use of the district's buildings, grounds, and facilities. Any 23services for which a charter school contracts with a school 24district shall be provided by the district at cost. Any 25services for which a charter school contracts with a local 26school board or with the governing body of a State college or   HB1072- 9 -LRB104 04498 LNS 14525 b1university or public community college shall be provided by 2the public entity at cost.3    (i) In no event shall a charter school that is established 4by converting an existing school or attendance center to 5charter school status be required to pay rent for space that is 6deemed available, as negotiated and provided in the charter 7agreement, in school district facilities. However, all other 8costs for the operation and maintenance of school district 9facilities that are used by the charter school shall be 10subject to negotiation between the charter school and the 11local school board and shall be set forth in the charter.12    (j) A charter school may limit student enrollment by age 13or grade level.14    (k) If the charter school is authorized by the State 15Board, then the charter school is its own local education 16agency. 17(Source: P.A. 102-51, eff. 7-9-21; 102-157, eff. 7-1-22; 18102-360, eff. 1-1-22; 102-445, eff. 8-20-21; 102-522, eff. 198-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-676, eff. 12-3-21; 20102-697, eff. 4-5-22; 102-702, eff. 7-1-23; 102-805, eff. 211-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-175, 22eff. 6-30-23; 103-472, eff. 8-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 23103-641, eff. 7-1-24; 103-806, eff. 1-1-25; revised 10-9-24.) 24    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 102-466)25    Sec. 27A-5. Charter school; legal entity; requirements.   HB1072- 10 -LRB104 04498 LNS 14525 b1    (a) A charter school shall be a public, nonsectarian, 2nonreligious, non-home based, and non-profit school. A charter 3school shall be organized and operated as a nonprofit 4corporation or other discrete, legal, nonprofit entity 5authorized under the laws of the State of Illinois.6    (b) A charter school may be established under this Article 7by creating a new school or by converting an existing public 8school or attendance center to charter school status. In all 9new applications to establish a charter school in a city 10having a population exceeding 500,000, operation of the 11charter school shall be limited to one campus. This limitation 12does not apply to charter schools existing or approved on or 13before April 16, 2003.14    (b-5) (Blank). 15    (c) A charter school shall be administered and governed by 16its board of directors or other governing body in the manner 17provided in its charter. The governing body of a charter 18school shall be subject to the Freedom of Information Act and 19the Open Meetings Act. A charter school's board of directors 20or other governing body must include at least one parent or 21guardian of a pupil currently enrolled in the charter school 22who may be selected through the charter school or a charter 23network election, appointment by the charter school's board of 24directors or other governing body, or by the charter school's 25Parent Teacher Organization or its equivalent. 26    (c-5) No later than January 1, 2021 or within the first   HB1072- 11 -LRB104 04498 LNS 14525 b1year of his or her first term, every voting member of a charter 2school's board of directors or other governing body shall 3complete a minimum of 4 hours of professional development 4leadership training to ensure that each member has sufficient 5familiarity with the board's or governing body's role and 6responsibilities, including financial oversight and 7accountability of the school, evaluating the principal's and 8school's performance, adherence to the Freedom of Information 9Act and the Open Meetings Act, and compliance with education 10and labor law. In each subsequent year of his or her term, a 11voting member of a charter school's board of directors or 12other governing body shall complete a minimum of 2 hours of 13professional development training in these same areas. The 14training under this subsection may be provided or certified by 15a statewide charter school membership association or may be 16provided or certified by other qualified providers approved by 17the State Board. 18    (d) For purposes of this subsection (d), "non-curricular 19health and safety requirement" means any health and safety 20requirement created by statute or rule to provide, maintain, 21preserve, or safeguard safe or healthful conditions for 22students and school personnel or to eliminate, reduce, or 23prevent threats to the health and safety of students and 24school personnel. "Non-curricular health and safety 25requirement" does not include any course of study or 26specialized instructional requirement for which the State   HB1072- 12 -LRB104 04498 LNS 14525 b1Board has established goals and learning standards or which is 2designed primarily to impart knowledge and skills for students 3to master and apply as an outcome of their education.4    A charter school shall comply with all non-curricular 5health and safety requirements applicable to public schools 6under the laws of the State of Illinois. The State Board shall 7promulgate and post on its Internet website a list of 8non-curricular health and safety requirements that a charter 9school must meet. The list shall be updated annually no later 10than September 1. Any charter contract between a charter 11school and its authorizer must contain a provision that 12requires the charter school to follow the list of all 13non-curricular health and safety requirements promulgated by 14the State Board and any non-curricular health and safety 15requirements added by the State Board to such list during the 16term of the charter. Nothing in this subsection (d) precludes 17an authorizer from including non-curricular health and safety 18requirements in a charter school contract that are not 19contained in the list promulgated by the State Board, 20including non-curricular health and safety requirements of the 21authorizing local school board. 22    (e) Except as otherwise provided in the School Code, a 23charter school shall not charge tuition; provided that a 24charter school may charge reasonable fees for textbooks, 25instructional materials, and student activities.26    (f) A charter school shall be responsible for the   HB1072- 13 -LRB104 04498 LNS 14525 b1management and operation of its fiscal affairs, including, but 2not limited to, the preparation of its budget. An audit of each 3charter school's finances shall be conducted annually by an 4outside, independent contractor retained by the charter 5school. The contractor shall not be an employee of the charter 6school or affiliated with the charter school or its authorizer 7in any way, other than to audit the charter school's finances. 8To ensure financial accountability for the use of public 9funds, on or before December 1 of every year of operation, each 10charter school shall submit to its authorizer and the State 11Board a copy of its audit and a copy of the Form 990 the 12charter school filed that year with the federal Internal 13Revenue Service. In addition, if deemed necessary for proper 14financial oversight of the charter school, an authorizer may 15require quarterly financial statements from each charter 16school. 17    (g) A charter school shall comply with all provisions of 18this Article, the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act, 19all federal and State laws and rules applicable to public 20schools that pertain to special education and the instruction 21of English learners, and its charter. A charter school is 22exempt from all other State laws and regulations in this Code 23governing public schools and local school board policies; 24however, a charter school is not exempt from the following:25        (1) Sections 10-21.9 and 34-18.5 of this Code 26    regarding criminal history records checks and checks of   HB1072- 14 -LRB104 04498 LNS 14525 b1    the Statewide Sex Offender Database and Statewide Murderer 2    and Violent Offender Against Youth Database of applicants 3    for employment;4        (2) Sections 10-20.14, 10-22.6, 22-100, 24-24, 34-19, 5    and 34-84a of this Code regarding discipline of students;6        (3) the Local Governmental and Governmental Employees 7    Tort Immunity Act;8        (4) Section 108.75 of the General Not For Profit 9    Corporation Act of 1986 regarding indemnification of 10    officers, directors, employees, and agents;11        (5) the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act;12        (5.5) subsection (b) of Section 10-23.12 and 13    subsection (b) of Section 34-18.6 of this Code;14        (6) the Illinois School Student Records Act;15        (7) Section 10-17a of this Code regarding school 16    report cards;17        (8) the P-20 Longitudinal Education Data System Act;18        (9) Section 27-23.7 of this Code regarding bullying 19    prevention;20        (10) Section 2-3.162 of this Code regarding student 21    discipline reporting;22        (11) Sections 22-80 and 27-8.1 of this Code;23        (12) Sections 10-20.60 and 34-18.53 of this Code;24        (13) Sections 10-20.63 and 34-18.56 of this Code;25        (14) Sections 22-90 and 26-18 of this Code;26        (15) Section 22-30 of this Code;   HB1072- 15 -LRB104 04498 LNS 14525 b1        (16) Sections 24-12 and 34-85 of this Code;2        (17) the Seizure Smart School Act;3        (18) Section 2-3.64a-10 of this Code;4        (19) Sections 10-20.73 and 34-21.9 of this Code;5        (20) Section 10-22.25b of this Code;6        (21) Section 27-9.1a of this Code;7        (22) Section 27-9.1b of this Code; 8        (23) Section 34-18.8 of this Code; 9        (24) Article 26A of this Code;10        (25) Section 2-3.188 of this Code;11        (26) Section 22-85.5 of this Code; 12        (27) subsections (d-10), (d-15), and (d-20) of Section 13    10-20.56 of this Code; 14        (28) Sections 10-20.83 and 34-18.78 of this Code; 15        (29) Section 10-20.13 of this Code; 16        (30) Section 28-19.2 of this Code; 17        (31) Section 34-21.6 of this Code;18        (32) Section 22-85.10 of this Code; 19        (33) Section 2-3.196 of this Code; 20        (34) Section 22-95 of this Code; 21        (35) Section 34-18.62 of this Code;22        (36) the Illinois Human Rights Act; and23        (37) Section 2-3.204 of this Code; and .24        (38) the Mobile Panic Alert System Act. 25    The change made by Public Act 96-104 to this subsection 26(g) is declaratory of existing law.  HB1072- 16 -LRB104 04498 LNS 14525 b1    (h) A charter school may negotiate and contract with a 2school district, the governing body of a State college or 3university or public community college, or any other public or 4for-profit or nonprofit private entity for: (i) the use of a 5school building and grounds or any other real property or 6facilities that the charter school desires to use or convert 7for use as a charter school site, (ii) the operation and 8maintenance thereof, and (iii) the provision of any service, 9activity, or undertaking that the charter school is required 10to perform in order to carry out the terms of its charter. 11Except as provided in subsection (i) of this Section, a school 12district may charge a charter school reasonable rent for the 13use of the district's buildings, grounds, and facilities. Any 14services for which a charter school contracts with a school 15district shall be provided by the district at cost. Any 16services for which a charter school contracts with a local 17school board or with the governing body of a State college or 18university or public community college shall be provided by 19the public entity at cost.20    (i) In no event shall a charter school that is established 21by converting an existing school or attendance center to 22charter school status be required to pay rent for space that is 23deemed available, as negotiated and provided in the charter 24agreement, in school district facilities. However, all other 25costs for the operation and maintenance of school district 26facilities that are used by the charter school shall be   HB1072- 17 -LRB104 04498 LNS 14525 b1subject to negotiation between the charter school and the 2local school board and shall be set forth in the charter.3    (j) A charter school may limit student enrollment by age 4or grade level.5    (k) If the charter school is authorized by the State 6Board, then the charter school is its own local education 7agency. 8(Source: P.A. 102-51, eff. 7-9-21; 102-157, eff. 7-1-22; 9102-360, eff. 1-1-22; 102-445, eff. 8-20-21; 102-466, eff. 107-1-25; 102-522, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-676, 11eff. 12-3-21; 102-697, eff. 4-5-22; 102-702, eff. 7-1-23; 12102-805, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff. 136-30-23; 103-175, eff. 6-30-23; 103-472, eff. 8-1-24; 103-605, 14eff. 7-1-24; 103-641, eff. 7-1-24; 103-806, eff. 1-1-25; 15revised 11-26-24.) 16    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 17changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 18that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 19represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 20not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 21made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 22Public Act. 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 241, 2026.